North Carolina statutes. Constitution of North Carolina
Article I Declaration of Rights

That the great, general, and essential principles of liberty and free government may be recognized and established, and that the relations of this State to the Union and government of the United States and those of the people of this State to the rest of the American people may be defined and affirmed, we do declare that:

§ 1. The equality and rights of persons.

We hold it to be self-evident that all persons are created equal; that they are endowed by their Creator with certain inalienable rights; that among these are life, liberty, the enjoyment of the fruits of their own labor, and the pursuit of happiness.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 1, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on the continuous revision of the Constitution, see 36 N.C.L. Rev. 297 (1958).

For case law survey as to constitutional law, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 855 (1967).

For comment on the public purpose doctrine, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 37 (1967).

For note on the use of state constitutional law to void occupational licensing statutes which unreasonably restrict freedom of occupational choice, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 507 (1977).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1116 (1981).

For essay, “ ‘Fundamental Principles’ in North Carolina Constitutional History,” see 69 N.C.L. Rev. 1357 (1991).

For article, “Rediscovering State Constitutions,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1741 (1992).

For article, “North Carolina Constitutional History,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1759 (1992).

For note, “The Cause of Action for Damages Under North Carolina’s Constitution: Corum v. University of North Carolina,” see 70 N.C.L. Rev. 1899 (1992).

For essay, “Liberty, the ‘Law of the Land,’ and Abortion in North Carolina,” see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1839 (1993).

For article discussing the rise and decline of the North Carolina Abortion Fund, see 22 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1999).

For article, “The Rising Tide of North Carolina Constitutional Protection in the New Millenium,” see 27 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (2005).

For article, “Thomas Ruffin and the Perils of Public Homage: When Analogy Fails:
The Common Law & State v. Mann,” see 87 N.C.L. Rev. 979 (2009).

For comment, “Out of Sight, Out of Mind: Indefinite Confinement and the Unconstitutional Treatment of North Carolinians with Mental Retardation,” see 35 Campbell L. Rev. 257 (2013).

For article, “ ‘Going Once, Going Twice….’: The Dubious Legality and Necessity of North Carolina’s Auctioneer License Statute,” see 91 N.C. L. Rev. 1887 (2013).

For article, “Thirty Years of Disappointment: North Carolina’s Remarkable Appellate Batson Record,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 1957 (2016).

For article, “Labor, Exclusion, and Flourishing in Property Law,” see 95 N.C.L. Rev. 415 (2017).

For article, “A National Lesson on the Dereliction and Declension of Educational Equality: The Cautionary Tale of California Charter Schools,” see 41 Campbell L. Rev. 1 (2019).

For article, “Tully v. City of Wilmington: A Fundamental Right To Be Treated Reasonably at Work,” see 98 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 1575 (2020).

For comment, “Misfire: How the North Carolina Pistol Purchase Permit System Misses the Mark of Constitutional Muster and Effectiveness,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 529 (2021).

For article, “Mirror, Mirror on the Wall:
Disney Princesses’ Reflections of Equal Protection,” see 56 Wake Forest L. Rev. 261 (2021).

§ 2. Sovereignty of the people.

All political power is vested in and derived from the people; all government of right originates from the people, is founded upon their will only, and is instituted solely for the good of the whole.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 2, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “A Powerless Judiciary? The North Carolina Courts’ Perceptions of Review of Administrative Action,” see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1980).

For survey of 1982 law on Criminal Procedure, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1090 (1983).

§ 3. Internal government of the State.

The people of this State have the inherent, sole, and exclusive right of regulating the internal government and police thereof, and of altering or abolishing their Constitution and form of government whenever it may be necessary to their safety and happiness; but every such right shall be exercised in pursuance of law and consistently with the Constitution of the United States.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 3, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For survey of 1982 law on criminal procedure, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1090 (1983).

For note, “’A Cloud of Constitutional Illegitimacy’: Prospectivity and the De Facto Doctrine in the Gerrymandering Context,” see 69 Duke L.J. 959 (2020).

§ 4. Secession prohibited.

This State shall ever remain a member of the American Union; the people thereof are part of the American Nation; there is no right on the part of this State to secede; and all attempts, from whatever source or upon whatever pretext, to dissolve this Union or to sever this Nation, shall be resisted with the whole power of the State.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 4, Const. 1868.

§ 5. Allegiance to the United States.

Every citizen of this State owes paramount allegiance to the Constitution and government of the United States, and no law or ordinance of the State in contravention or subversion thereof can have any binding force.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 5, Const. 1868.

§ 6. Separation of powers.

The legislative, executive, and supreme judicial powers of the State government shall be forever separate and distinct from each other.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 8, Const. 1868.

Defeated Amendment Proposals.

Session Laws 2018-117, s. 2, proposed an amendment to
Sec. 6 of Article I of the North Carolina Constitution, which would have added a paragraph (2):
“The legislative powers of the State government shall control the powers, duties, responsibilities, appointments, and terms of office of any board or commission prescribed by general law. The executive powers of the State government shall be used to faithfully execute the general laws prescribing the board or commission.” The constitutional amendment was submitted to the voters at the general election held November 6, 2018, and was defeated.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on judicial review and separation of powers, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 467 (1967).

For case law survey as to separation of powers, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 891 (1967).

For note analyzing possible constitutional barriers to judicial abrogation of contractual governmental immunity, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1082 (1976).

For survey of 1979 constitutional law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1326 (1980).

For comment on sectarian education and the state, see 1980 Duke L.J. 801.

For article, “A Powerless Judiciary? The North Carolina Courts’ Perceptions of Review of Administrative Action,” see 12 N.C. Cent. L.J. 21 (1980).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For article discussing limitations on ad hoc adjudicatory rulemaking by an administrative agency, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 67 (1982).

For survey of 1982 law relating to constitutional law, see 61 N.C.L. Rev. 1052 (1983).

For discussion of separation of powers in North Carolina, see 62 N.C.L. Rev. 1 (1983).

For article on the “Battle Among the Branches: The Two Hundred Year War,” see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 901 (1987).

For note on the separation of powers and the power to appoint, see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1109 (1988).

For note, “The Forty-Two Hundred Dollar Question: ‘May State Agencies Have Discretion in Setting Civil Penalties Under the North Carolina Constitution?’,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 1035 (1990).

For comment, “Legal Analysis of the Constitutionality of the Water Supply Watershed Protection Act of 1989 and the Hyde Bill,” see 29 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1279 (1994).

For article, “A Study in Separation of Powers:
Executive Power in North Carolina,” see 77 N.C.L. Rev. 2049 (1999).

For article, “Ring v. Arizona and Capital Proceedings:
Brave New World or a Reversion to the Old World?,” see 30 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 107 (2008).

For article, “Tully v. City of Wilmington: A Fundamental Right To Be Treated Reasonably at Work,” see 98 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 1575 (2020).

§ 7. Suspending laws.

All power of suspending laws or the execution of laws by any authority, without the consent of the representatives of the people, is injurious to their rights and shall not be exercised.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 9, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Tully v. City of Wilmington: A Fundamental Right To Be Treated Reasonably at Work,” see 98 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 1575 (2020).

§ 8. Representation and taxation.

The people of this State shall not be taxed or made subject to the payment of any impost or duty without the consent of themselves or their representatives in the General Assembly, freely given.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 23, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on taxation and revenue bonds to finance low-income housing, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 830 (1971).

For article, “Here Is the Church, Where Is the Steeple: Foundation of Human Understanding v. United States,” see 89 N.C.L. Rev. 1248 (2011).

For article, “Expanding Printz in the Sanctuary City Debate,” see 40 Campbell L. Rev. 237 (2018).

§ 9. Frequent elections.

For redress of grievances and for amending and strengthening the laws, elections shall be often held.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 28, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Bill of Attainder:
‘Old Wine in New Bottles’,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 278 (2014).

For article, “Liberty Is Not Loco-motion: Obergefell and the Originalists’ Due Process Fallacy,” see 40 Campbell L. Rev. 482 (2018).

§ 10. Free elections.

All elections shall be free.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 10, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Bill of Attainder:
‘Old Wine in New Bottles’,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 278 (2014).

For article, “Reconceptualizing the Eighth Amendment: Slaves, Prisoners, and ‘Cruel and Unusual’ Punishment,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 817 (2016).

§ 11. Property qualifications.

As political rights and privileges are not dependent upon or modified by property, no property qualification shall affect the right to vote or hold office.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 22, Const. 1868.

§ 12. Right of assembly and petition.

The people have a right to assemble together to consult for their common good, to instruct their representatives, and to apply to the General Assembly for redress of grievances; but secret political societies are dangerous to the liberties of a free people and shall not be tolerated.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 25, Const. 1868, as amended by the Convention of 1875.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “North Carolina’s Declaration of Rights: Fertile Ground in a Federal Climate,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 145 (2014).

§ 13. Religious liberty.

All persons have a natural and inalienable right to worship Almighty God according to the dictates of their own consciences, and no human authority shall, in any case whatever, control or interfere with the rights of conscience.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to student rights to engage in prayer and religious activity in public schools, see

G.S. 115C-407.30

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 26, Const. 1868, as amended in 1946.

Legal Periodicals.

For case law survey as to freedom of religion, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 862 (1967).

For comment, “The State and Sectarian Education: Regulation to Deregulation,” see 1980 Duke L.J. 801.

For note on state regulation of public solicitation for religious purposes, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 996 (1980).

For note, “Delconte v. State: Some Thoughts on Home Education,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1302 (1986).

For article, “The Concept of Religion in State Constitutions,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 437 (1986).

For note, “Balancing the Welfare of Children with the Rights of Parents: Peterson v. Rogers and the Role of Religion in Custody Disputes,” see 73 N.C.L. Rev. 1271 (1995).

For article, “The Least of These: A Constitutional Challenge to North Carolina’s Sexual Offender Laws and N.C. Gen. Stat. § 14-208.18,” see 33 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 53 (2010).

For article, “Religion and the Purification of Reason: Why the Liberal State Requires More Than Simple Tolerance,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 505
(2011).

For comment, “From Rosenberger to Martinez: Why the Rise of Hyper-Modernism is a Bad Thing for Religious Freedom,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 699 (2011).

For comment, “Were the Framers - and the Writers who Influenced Them - Unable to Foresee the Extent of Secularization that could Result From the Separation of Church and State?,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 723 (2011).

For note, “The Need for Breedlove in North Carolina: Why North Carolina Courts Should Employ a Strict Scrutiny Review for Religious Liberty Claims Even in Wake of Smith,” see 9 Elon L. Rev. 247 (2017).

For comment, “Trinity Lutheran Church of Columbia, Inc. v. Comer:
No Discrimination Based on Religious Identity,” see 54 Wake Forest L. Rev. 251 (2019).

For note, “’Souls Aren’t Saved Just in Church Buildings: Defining ‘Religious Exercise’ Under the Religious Land Use and Institutionalized Persons Act,” see 69 Duke L.J. 1353 (2020).

For article, “Religious Liberty in a Pandemic,” see 70 Duke L.J. Online 1 (2020).

§ 14. Freedom of speech and press.

Freedom of speech and of the press are two of the great bulwarks of liberty and therefore shall never be restrained, but every person shall be held responsible for their abuse.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 20, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article analyzing the evolution of free speech rights under U.S. Const., Amend. I in North Carolina, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 243 (1982).

For article, “Of Libel, Language, and Law: New York Times v. Sullivan at Twenty-Five,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 273 (1990).

For note, “Striking an Unequal Balance: The Fourth Circuit Holds that Public School Teachers Do Not Have First Amendment Rights to Set Curricula in Boring v. Buncombe County Board of Education,” see 77 N. C. L. Rev. 1960 (1999).

For article, “A Kantian Right of Publicity,” see 1999 Duke L.J. 383.

For article, “Political Patronage and North Carolina Law: Is Political Conformity With the Sheriff a Permissible Job Requirement for Deputies?,” see 79 N.C.L. Rev. 1743 (2001).

For article, “The Rising Tide of North Carolina Constitutional Protection in the New Millenium,” see 27 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (2005).

For comment, “Constitutional Protection for Nonmedia Defendants: Should There be a Distinction Between You and Larry King?,” see 33 Campbell L. Rev. 173 (2010).

For article, “North Carolina’s Declaration of Rights: Fertile Ground in a Federal Climate,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 145 (2014).

For article, “A Reckless Disregard for the Truth? The Constitutional Right to Lie in Politics,” see 38 Campbell L. Rev. 41 (2016).

For article, “The Structure of Modern Free Speech Doctrine: Strict Scrutiny, Intermediate Review, and ‘Reasonableness’ Balancing,” see 8 Elon L. Rev. 291 (2016).

For comment, “Find Out Who Your Friends Are: A Framework for Determining Whether Employees’ Social Media Followers Follow Them to a New Job,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 493 (2017).

For note, “A Picture is Worth a Thousand Material Connection Disclosures:
Endorsers, Instagram, and the Federal Trade Commission’s Endorsement Guides,” see 66 Duke L.J. 1371 (2017).

For article, “Malign Manipulations:
Can Google’s Shareholders Save Democracy?,” see 54 Wake Forest L. Rev. 707 (2019).

§ 15. Education.

The people have a right to the privilege of education, and it is the duty of the State to guard and maintain that right.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 27, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on state regulation of private religious schools, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 405 (1980).

For article analyzing the evolution of first amendment speech rights in North Carolina, see 4 Campbell L. Rev. 243 (1982).

For note, “Delconte v. State: Some Thoughts on Home Education,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1302 (1986).

For article, “Constitutional Rights of Students, Their Families, and Teachers in the Public Schools,” see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 353 (1988).

For article, “Of Libel, Language, and Law: New York Times v. Sullivan at Twenty-Five,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 273 (1990).

For a survey of 1996 developments in constitutional law, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2252 (1997).

For note on Leandro v. State,

346 N.C. 336

, 488 S.E.2d 249 (1997), annotated under this section, see 76 N.C.L. Rev. 1481 (1998).

For article, “Leandro v. State and the Constitutional Limitation on School Suspensions and Expulsions in North Carolina,” see 83 N.C. L. Rev. 1507 (2005).

For article, “The Education Duty,” see 47 Wake Forest L. Rev. 705 (2012).

For article, “Leandro’s Limit: Do North Carolina’s Homeschoolers Have a Right to a Sound Basic Education Protected by the State?,” see 36 Campbell L. Rev. 253 (2014).

For article, “North Carolina’s Declaration of Rights: Fertile Ground in a Federal Climate,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 145 (2014).

For comment, “Leandro’s Left Behind: How North Carolina’s English Learners Have Been Denied Their Fundamental Right to a Sound Basic Education,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 457 (2017).

For article, “Far From a ‘Dead Letter’: The Contract Clause and North Carolina Association of Educators v. State,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 168 (2018).

For comment, “Seeking Shelter: How North Carolina is Violating the State Constitution by Failing to Properly Educate its Homeless Students,” see 42 Campbell L. Rev. 361 (2020).

For comment, “Charter Schools, EMOs, and Sovereign Immunity,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 753 (2021).

§ 16. Ex post facto laws.

Retrospective laws, punishing acts committed before the existence of such laws and by them only declared criminal, are oppressive, unjust, and incompatible with liberty, and therefore no ex post facto law shall be enacted. No law taxing retrospectively sales, purchases, or other acts previously done shall be enacted.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 32, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Ring v. Arizona and Capital Proceedings:
Brave New World or a Reversion to the Old World?,” see 30 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 107 (2008).

For article, “Bill of Attainder:
‘Old Wine in New Bottles’,” see 36 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 278 (2014).

§ 17. Slavery and involuntary servitude.

Slavery is forever prohibited. Involuntary servitude, except as a punishment for crime whereof the parties have been adjudged guilty, is forever prohibited.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 33, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “The New Peonage:
Liberty and Precarity for Workers in the Gig Economy,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1087 (2020).

§ 18. Courts shall be open.

All courts shall be open; every person for an injury done him in his lands, goods, person, or reputation shall have remedy by due course of law; and right and justice shall be administered without favor, denial, or delay.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 35, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For comment on unborn child being a person within the meaning of this section, see 28 N.C.L. Rev. 245 (1950).

For note on criminal defendants’ rights during sentencing, see 50 N.C.L. Rev. 925 (1977).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For note, “Wilder v. Amatex Corp.: A First Step Toward Ameliorating the Effect of Statutes of Repose on Plaintiffs with Delayed Manifestation Diseases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 416 (1986).

For note on the six year statutory bar to products liability actions, in light of Tetterton v. Long Manufacturing Co.,

314 N.C. 44

, 332 S.E.2d 67 (1985), see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1157 (1986).

For article, “The American Medical Association vs. The American Tort System,” see 8 Campbell L. Rev. 241 (1986).

For comment on tort reform, see 10 Campbell L. Rev. 439 (1988).

For article, “North Carolina Employment Law After Coman: Reaffirming Basic Rights in the Workplace,” see 24 Wake Forest L. Rev. 905 (1989).

For note, “The North Carolina Supreme Court Engages in Stealthy Judicial Legislation: Doe v. Holt,” see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1227 (1993).

For note, “Rule 9(j) — Is Requiring a Plaintiff in a Medical Malpractice Action to Certify His or Her Claim Before Filing Unconstitutional? — The Issue in Anderson v. Assimos,” see 25 Campbell L. Rev. 219 (2003).

For note, “The Constitutional Floor Doctrine and the Right to a Speedy Trial,” see 26 Campbell L. Rev. 101 (2004).

For article, “The Rising Tide of North Carolina Constitutional Protection in the New Millenium,” see 27 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (2005).

For article, “The Past is Never Dead: Magna Carta in North Carolina,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 1635 (2016).

For comment, “A Perfect Storm:
Prosecutorial Calendar Control and the Right to a Speedy Trial in the North Carolina Criminal Court System,” see 56 Wake Forest L. Rev. 169 (2021).

§ 19. Law of the land; equal protection of the laws.

No person shall be taken, imprisoned, or disseized of his freehold, liberties, or privileges, or outlawed, or exiled, or in any manner deprived of his life, liberty, or property, but by the law of the land. No person shall be denied the equal protection of the laws; nor shall any person be subjected to discrimination by the State because of race, color, religion, or national origin.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to the rights of the defendant in a criminal prosecution, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 23.

For provision that no person shall be excluded from jury service on account of sex, race, color, religion or national origin, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 26.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 17, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on eminent domain in North Carolina, see 35 N.C.L. Rev. 296 (1957).

For note on right of confrontation at presentence investigation, see 41 N.C.L. Rev. 260 (1963).

For comment on the cul-de-sac doctrine, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 850 (1966).

For case law survey as to eminent domain, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 941, 1003 (1966).

For case law survey as to due process and double jeopardy, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 881 (1967).

For case law survey as to right to notice and hearing, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 883 (1967).

For case law survey as to property rights, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 887 (1967).

For comment on the public purpose doctrine, see 3 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 37 (1967).

For note on statutory requirement of safety helmets for motorcyclists, see 6 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 349 (1970).

For article surveying recent decisions by the North Carolina Supreme Court in the area of criminal procedure, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 262 (1971).

For note analyzing possible constitutional barriers to judicial abrogation of contractual governmental immunity, see 12 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1082 (1976).

For note on use of physical restraints on defendant during trial, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 231 (1977).

For note on the use of state constitutional law to void occupational licensing statutes which unreasonably restrict freedom of occupational choice, see 13 Wake Forest L. Rev. 507 (1977).

For survey of 1979 administrative law, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 1185 (1980).

For note on state regulation of public solicitation for religious purposes, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 996 (1980).

For survey of 1980 law on civil procedure, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1047 (1981).

For survey of 1980 constitutional law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1097 (1981).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For 1984 survey, “Double Jeopardy and Substantial Rights in North Carolina Appeals,” see 63 N.C.L. Rev. 1061 (1985).

For note on the Declaratory Judgment Act and due process in expulsions from voluntary trade associations, in light of Harrison v. Gaston Bd. of Realtors, Inc.,

311 N.C. 230

, 316 S.E.2d 59 (1984), see 21 Wake Forest L. Rev. 121 (1985).

For note, “Wilder v. Amatex Corp.: A First Step Toward Ameliorating the Effect of Statutes of Repose on Plaintiffs with Delayed Manifestation Diseases,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 416 (1986).

For article, “The Battle to Preserve North Carolina’s Estuarine Marshes: The 1985 Legislation, Private Claims to Estuarine Marshes, Denial of Permits to Fill, and the Public Trust,” see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 565 (1986).

For note on the six year statutory bar to products liability actions, in light of Tetterton v. Long Manufacturing Co.,

314 N.C. 44

, 332 S.E.2d 67 (1985), see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1157 (1986).

For note on the retroactive application of

G.S. 39-13.6

under a vested rights analysis, see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1195 (1987).

For note discussing the evolution of the law governing double jeopardy and multiple punishments in a single prosecution context, particularly with regard to larceny and breaking and entering, in light of State v. Gardner,

315 N.C. 444

, 340 S.E.2d 701 (1986), see 65 N.C.L. Rev. 1267 (1987).

For note, “Does Double Jeopardy Include a Double Standard?,” see 66 N.C.L. Rev. 1191 (1988).

For article, “In Defense of Aston Park: The Case for State Substantive Due Process Review of Health Care Regulation,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 253 (1990).

For article, “Ake Revisited: Expert Psychiatric Witnesses Remain Beyond Reach for the Indigent,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 763 (1990).

For note, “United States v. Halper: Remedial Justice and Double Jeopardy,” see 68 N.C.L. Rev. 979 (1990).

For essay, “Liberty, the ‘Law of the Land,’ and Abortion in North Carolina,” see 71 N.C.L. Rev. 1839 (1993).

For a comment on the acquisition, abandonment, and preservation of rail corridors in North Carolina, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 1989 (1997).

For a survey of 1996 developments in the law regarding prisoner rights, see 75 N.C.L. Rev. 2428 (1997).

For article discussing the rise and decline of North Carolina Abortion Fund, see 22 Campbell L. Rev. 119 (1999).

For note, “Rule 9(j) — Is Requiring a Plaintiff in a Medical Malpractice Action to Certify His or Her Claim Before Filing Unconstitutional? — The Issue in Anderson v. Assimos,” see 25 Campbell L. Rev. 219 (2003).

For article, “The Rising Tide of North Carolina Constitutional Protection in the New Millenium,” see 27 Campbell L. Rev. 223 (2005).

For article, “Outlawed and Exiled:
Zero Tolerance and Second Generation Race Discrimination in Public Schools,” see 29 N.C. Cent. L.J. 147 (2007).

For article, “To Be Real:
Sexual Identity Politics in Tort Litigation,” see 88 N.C.L. Rev. 357 (2010).

For article, “Do the Mentally Ill Have a Right to Bear Arms?,” see 48 Wake Forest L. Rev. 1 (2013).

For article, “The Past is Never Dead: Magna Carta in North Carolina,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 1635 (2016).

For article, “Preserving Your Right to Parent: The Supreme Court of North Carolina Addresses Unmarried Fathers’ Due Process Rights in In Re Adoption of S.D.W.,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 723 (2016).

For note, “The Need for Breedlove in North Carolina: Why North Carolina Courts Should Employ a Strict Scrutiny Review for Religious Liberty Claims Even in Wake of Smith,” see 9 Elon L. Rev. 247 (2017).

For note, “Competency, Counsel, and Criminal Defendants’ Inability to Participate,” see 67 Duke L.J. 1219 (2018).

For article, “Far From a ‘Dead Letter’: The Contract Clause and North Carolina Association of Educators v. State,” see 96 N.C.L. Rev. 168 (2018).

For article, “LIFE WITHOUT PAROLE SENTENCING IN NORTH CAROLINA ,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 279 (2021).

§ 20. General warrants.

General warrants, whereby any officer or other person may be commanded to search suspected places without evidence of the act committed, or to seize any person or persons not named, whose offense is not particularly described and supported by evidence, are dangerous to liberty and shall not be granted.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to searches and seizures, see

G.S. 15A-231

.

As to search warrants, see

G.S. 15A-241

.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 15, Const. 1868.

§ 21. Inquiry into restraints on liberty.

Every person restrained of his liberty is entitled to a remedy to inquire into the lawfulness thereof, and to remove the restraint if unlawful, and that remedy shall not be denied or delayed. The privilege of the writ of habeas corpus shall not be suspended.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to habeas corpus, see

G.S. 17-1

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of the first sentence of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 18, Const. 1868, and the provisions of the second sentence of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 21, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article surveying recent decisions by the North Carolina Supreme Court in the area of criminal procedure, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 262 (1971).

For comment, “Out of Sight, Out of Mind: Indefinite Confinement and the Unconstitutional Treatment of North Carolinians with Mental Retardation,” see 35 Campbell L. Rev. 257 (2013).

§ 22. Modes of prosecution.

Except in misdemeanor cases initiated in the District Court Division, no person shall be put to answer any criminal charge but by indictment, presentment, or impeachment. But any person, when represented by counsel, may, under such regulations as the General Assembly shall prescribe, waive indictment in noncapital cases.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to indictments and related instruments, see

G.S. 15A-641

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 12, Const. 1868, as amended in 1950.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on jurisdiction of courts-martial to try servicemen for civilian offenses, see 48 N.C.L. Rev. 380 (1970).

For note examining the development of constitutional protections against race and class discrimination in the selection of jurors, and policy considerations associated with extending these principles to foreman selection procedures, in light of State v. Cofield, 77 N.C. App. 699, 336 S.E.2d 439 (1985), see 64 N.C.L. Rev. 1179 (1986).

For article, “The Nature and Extent of the Exercise of Criminal Jurisdiction by the Cherokee Supreme Court: 1823-1835,” see 32 N.C. Cent. L. Rev. 27 (2009).

For article, “Capital Punishment in North Carolina: A Justice’s View on Why We Can ‘No Longer Tinker with the Machinery of Death’,” see 99 N.C. L. Rev. Addendum 1 (2020).

§ 23. Rights of accused.

In all criminal prosecutions, every person charged with crime has the right to be informed of the accusation and to confront the accusers and witnesses with other testimony, and to have counsel for defense, and not be compelled to give self-incriminating evidence, or to pay costs, jail fees, or necessary witness fees of the defense, unless found guilty.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to the rights of defendants in criminal cases, see also N.C. Const., Art. I, § 19 and the notes thereunder.

As to modes of prosecution, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 22.

As to the right of jury trial in criminal cases, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 24.

As to representation of indigent defendants, see Chapter 7A, Articles 36 through 38A (G.S. 7A-450 et seq.).

As to testimony of defendants in criminal actions, see

G.S. 8-54

.

As to witness testifying to any unlawful gaming done by himself or others, see

G.S. 8-55

.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 11, Const. 1868, as amended in 1946.

§ 24. Right of jury trial in criminal cases.

No person shall be convicted of any crime but by the unanimous verdict of a jury in open court, except that a person accused of any criminal offense for which the State is not seeking a sentence of death in superior court may, in writing or on the record in the court and with the consent of the trial judge, waive jury trial, subject to procedures prescribed by the General Assembly. The General Assembly may, however, provide for other means of trial for misdemeanors, with the right of appeal for trial de novo.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1; 2013-300, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to jurors, generally, see

G.S. 9-1

et seq.

As to the rights of defendants in criminal cases to grand juries and trial juries from which persons have not been arbitrarily excluded on discriminatory grounds, see also N.C. Const., Art. I, § 19 and the notes thereunder.

For provision prohibiting exclusion from jury service on discriminatory grounds, see N.C. Const., Art. I, § 26.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 13, Const. 1868, as amended in 1946.

§ 25. Right of jury trial in civil cases.

In all controversies at law respecting property, the ancient mode of trial by jury is one of the best securities of the rights of the people, and shall remain sacred and inviolable.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

As to jury trials and waiver of same in civil cases, see

G.S. 1A-1

, Rules 38 and 39.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of the first sentence of Art. I, § 19, Const. 1868, as amended in 1946.

Legal Periodicals.

As to less than unanimous jury verdicts in civil cases, see 27 N.C.L. Rev. 539 (1949).

For note on the power of the court to increase a jury award by additur, see 37 N.C.L. Rev. 169 (1959).

For case law survey as to indictment and trial by jury, see 45 N.C.L. Rev. 878 (1967).

For note on directed verdicts in favor of the party with the burden of proof, see 16 Wake Forest L. Rev. 607 (1980).

For survey of 1981 constitutional law, see 60 N.C.L. Rev. 1272 (1982).

For article, “Where Do We Go From Here:
Obsolescence or Resurgence:
An Analysis of the Continued Viability of the U.S. Supreme Court in Contemporary America,” see 12 Elon L. Rev. 362 (2020).

For article, “The Supreme Court and the Politics in the Trump Era,” see 12 Elon L. Rev. 215 (2020).

§ 26. Jury service.

No person shall be excluded from jury service on account of sex, race, color, religion, or national origin.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of the second sentence of Art. I, § 19, Const. 1868, as amended in 1946.

Legal Periodicals.

For article, “Race-Based Peremptories No Longer Permitted in Civil Trials: Jackson v. Housing Authority of High Point,” see 67 N.C.L. Rev. 1262 (1989).

For article, “Thirty Years of Disappointment: North Carolina’s Remarkable Appellate Batson Record,” see 94 N.C.L. Rev. 1957 (2016).

For article, “Equal Dignity and Unequal Protection:
A Framework for Analyzing Disparate Impact Claims,” see 68 Duke L.J.
Online 149 (2019).

§ 27. Bail, fines, and punishments.

Excessive bail shall not be required, nor excessive fines imposed, nor cruel or unusual punishments inflicted.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

Cross references.

For general provisions as to bail, see

G.S. 15A-531

et seq.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 14, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For article on punishment for crime in North Carolina, see 17 N.C.L. Rev. 205 (1939).

For case law survey as to cruel and unusual punishment, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 936 (1966); 45 N.C.L. Rev. 864 (1967).

For note on appellate review of legal but excessive sentences, see 44 N.C.L. Rev. 1118 (1966).

For comment on bail in North Carolina, see 5 Wake Forest Intra. L. Rev. 300 (1969).

For article surveying recent decisions by the North Carolina Supreme Court in the area of criminal procedure, see 49 N.C.L. Rev. 262 (1971).

For article, “Sentencing Due Process: Evolving Constitutional Principles,” see 18 Wake Forest L. Rev. 523 (1982).

For note, “United States v. Bryant, Federal Habitual Offender Laws, and the Rights of Defendants in Tribal Courts: A Better Solution to Domestic Violence Exists,” see 39 Campbell L. Rev. 205 (2017).

For article, “Fees, Fines, Bail, and the Destitution Pipeline,” see 69 Duke L.J. 1463 (2020).

For article, “Cruel State Punishments,” see 98 N.C.L. Rev. 1201 (2020).

For article, “Wrestling with Risk:
The Questions Beyond Money Bail,” see 98 N. C.L. Rev. 379 (2020).

For article, “The Next Step:
Building, Funding, and Measuring Pretrial Services (Post-Bail Reforms),” see 98 N. C.L. Rev. 389 (2020).

For article, “Bail in North Carolina,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 907 (2020).

For article, “The Transparency of Jail Data,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 821 (2020).

For article, “The Due Process of Bail,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 757 (2020).

For article, “The Political Patterns of Bail Reform,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 743 (2020).

For article, “‘With a Little Help from my Friends:’ Counsel at Bail and Enhanced Pretrial Justice Becomes the New Reality,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 795 (2020).

For article, “Does Bail Reform Increase Crime?
An Empirical Assessment of the Public Safety Implications of Bail Reform in Cook County, Illinois,” see 55 Wake Forest L. Rev. 933 (2020).

For article, “Handling Aggravating Facts After Blakely: Findings from Five Presumptive-Guidelines States,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 1241 (2021).

For article, “The Sixth and Eighth Amendment Nexus and the Future of Mandatory Sentences,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 1311 (2021).

For article, “The Sixth Amendment Sentencing Right and Its Remedy,” see 99 N.C.L. Rev. 1195 (2021).

§ 28. Imprisonment for debt.

There shall be no imprisonment for debt in this State, except in cases of fraud.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 16, Const. 1868.

Legal Periodicals.

For note on specific performance of separation agreements, see 58 N.C.L. Rev. 867 (1980).

For survey of 1980 tort law, see 59 N.C.L. Rev. 1239 (1981).

§ 29. Treason against the State.

Treason against the State shall consist only of levying war against it or adhering to its enemies by giving them aid and comfort. No person shall be convicted of treason unless on the testimony of two witnesses to the same overt act, or on confession in open court. No conviction of treason or attainder shall work corruption of blood or forfeiture.

History.

1969, c. 1258, s. 1.

History Note.

The provisions of this section are similar to those of Art. I, § 37, Const. 1868, as amended in 1962.